tests/ger_fut.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Accusative": 
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px1sg><acc> : барыахпын
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px2sg><acc> : барыаххын
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px3sp><acc> : барыаҕын
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px1pl><acc> : барыахпытын
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px2pl><acc> : барыаххытын
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px3sp><acc> : барыахтарын

    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px1sg><acc> : барымыахпын
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px2sg><acc> : барымыаххын
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px3sp><acc> : барымыаҕын
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px1pl><acc> : барымыахпытын
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px2pl><acc> : барымыаххытын
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px3sp><acc> : барымыахтарын

  "Dative": 
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px1sg><dat> : барыахпар
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px2sg><dat> : барыаххар
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px3sp><dat> : барыаҕар
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px1pl><dat> : барыахпытыгар
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px2pl><dat> : барыаххытыгар
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px3sp><dat> : барыахтарыгар

    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px1sg><dat> : барымыахпар
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px2sg><dat> : барымыаххар
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px3sp><dat> : барымыаҕар
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px1pl><dat> : барымыахпытыгар
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px2pl><dat> : барымыаххытыгар
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px3sp><dat> : барымыахтарыгар

  "Ablative": 
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px1sg><abl> : барыахпыттан
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px2sg><abl> : барыаххыттан
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px3sp><abl> : барыаҕыттан
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px1pl><abl> : барыахпытыттан
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px2pl><abl> : барыаххытыттан
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px3sp><abl> : барыахтарыттан

    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px1sg><abl> : барымыахпыттан
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px2sg><abl> : барымыаххыттан
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px3sp><abl> : барымыаҕыттан
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px1pl><abl> : барымыахпытыттан
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px2pl><abl> : барымыаххытыттан
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px3sp><abl> : барымыахтарыттан

  "Instrumental": 
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px1sg><ins> : барыахпынан
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px2sg><ins> : барыаххынан
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px3sp><ins> : барыаҕынан
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px1pl><ins> : барыахпытынан
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px2pl><ins> : барыаххытынан
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px3sp><ins> : барыахтарынан

    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px1sg><ins> : барымыахпынан
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px2sg><ins> : барымыаххынан
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px3sp><ins> : барымыаҕынан
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px1pl><ins> : барымыахпытынан
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px2pl><ins> : барымыаххытынан
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px3sp><ins> : барымыахтарынан

  "Comitative": 
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px1sg><com> : барыахпыныын
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px2sg><com> : барыаххыныын
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px3sp><com> : барыаҕыныын
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px1pl><com> : барыахпытыныын
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px2pl><com> : барыаххытыныын
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px3sp><com> : барыахтарыныын

    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px1sg><com> : барымыахпыныын
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px2sg><com> : барымыаххыныын
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px3sp><com> : барымыаҕыныын
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px1pl><com> : барымыахпытыныын
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px2pl><com> : барымыаххытыныын
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px3sp><com> : барымыахтарыныын

  "Comparative": 
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px1sg><comp> : барыахпынааҕар
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px2sg><comp> : барыаххынааҕар
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px3sp><comp> : барыаҕынааҕар
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px1pl><comp> : барыахпытынааҕар
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px2pl><comp> : барыаххытынааҕар
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><px3sp><comp> : барыахтарынааҕар

    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px1sg><comp> : барымыахпынааҕар
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px2sg><comp> : барымыаххынааҕар
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px3sp><comp> : барымыаҕынааҕар
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px1pl><comp> : барымыахпытынааҕар
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px2pl><comp> : барымыаххытынааҕар
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_fut><px3sp><comp> : барымыахтарынааҕар
